California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(B) The income and apportionment factors of the nonelecting taxpayer are reflected in the self-assessed combined reporting group of a timely filed original return of an electing taxpayer, and the notification of election filed by the electing taxpayer pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is signed by an officer or other authorized agent of either a parent corporation of the nonelecting taxpayer or another corporation with authority
 to bind the nonelecting taxpayer to an election.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a “parent corporation” of the taxpayer is a corporation that owns or constructively owns stock possessing more than 50 percent of the voting power of the taxpayer as determined under subdivisions (e) and (f) of Section 25105.

(4) If a corporation that is a member of a combined reporting group is not itself subject to taxation under this part in the year for which the water’s-edge election is made, but subsequently becomes subject to taxation under this part, that corporation shall be deemed to have elected with the other taxpayer members of the combined reporting group.

(5) If a unitary corporation not incorporated in the United
 States that is not itself subject to taxation under this part in the year for which the valid water’s-edge election is made, but subsequently becomes subject to taxation under this part solely due to subdivision (b) of Section 23101 in a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2021, that corporation shall be deemed to have elected with the other members of the unitary combined reporting group.

(6) A taxpayer that is engaged in more than one apportioning trade or business as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (d) of Section 25128 may make a separate election for each apportioning trade or business.

(c) A water’s-edge election shall remain in effect or be terminated in accordance with this subdivision.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, if one or more electing taxpayer members of a combined reporting group later become disaffiliated or otherwise cease to be included in the combined reporting group, the water’s-edge election shall remain in effect as to both the departing taxpayer members and any remaining taxpayer members.

(2) If an electing taxpayer and a nonelecting taxpayer become members of a new unitary affiliate group, the nonelecting taxpayer shall be deemed to have elected if the value of the total business assets of the electing taxpayer, and its component unitary group, if any, is larger than the value of the total business assets of the nonelecting taxpayer, and its component unitary group, if any. Otherwise, the water’s-edge election shall be automatically terminated at the time the electing
 members become part of the combined report. For purposes of applying paragraphs (9) and (10), the commencement date of the deemed election shall be the same as the commencement date of the electing taxpayers.

(3) If taxpayers filing under water’s-edge elections with different commencement dates become members of a new unitary affiliate group, the earliest election date shall be deemed to apply to all electing taxpayers if the total business assets of the earlier electing taxpayer, and its component unitary group, if any, is larger than the value of the total business assets of the later electing taxpayer, and its component unitary group, if any. Otherwise, the later election commencement date shall apply to all electing taxpayers.

(4) (A) If a taxpayer with an
 election that has been terminated under paragraph (9) or (10) becomes a member of a new unitary affiliate group that includes another electing or nonelecting taxpayer not affected by those paragraphs, any water’s-edge election of the other taxpayer member, if applicable, shall terminate, and any restrictions on making a new water’s-edge election, relating to an election terminated under those paragraphs, shall apply to all taxpayer members of the new unitary affiliate group if the total business assets of the taxpayer with the terminated election, and its component unitary group, if any, is larger than the other taxpayer, and its component unitary group, if any. Otherwise, paragraph (2) shall apply, if applicable. If paragraph (2) does not apply, all taxpayer members of the new unitary affiliate group will be treated as nonelecting taxpayers that are not subject to any restrictions on making a new
 water’s-edge election.

(B) If two nonelecting taxpayers with different termination dates under paragraph (9) or (10) become members of a new unitary affiliate group, the earliest termination date shall be deemed to apply to all nonelecting taxpayers, as well as any restrictions on making a new water’s-edge election relating to that termination, if the total business assets of the earlier terminating taxpayer, and its component unitary group, if any, is larger than the value of the total business assets of the later terminating taxpayer, and its component unitary group, if any. Otherwise, the later termination date, and the related restrictions on making a new water’s-edge election, shall apply to all taxpayer members of the new unitary affiliate group.

(5) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), if one or more electing taxpayers did not report their income and apportionment factors as members of a combined reporting group with one or more nonelecting taxpayers, and, pursuant to a Franchise Tax Board audit determination, the nonelecting taxpayers, are properly in the same combined reporting group as the electing taxpayers, the water’s-edge election of the electing taxpayers shall remain in effect and the nonelecting taxpayers shall be deemed to have made a water’s-edge election. The commencement date of the deemed water’s-edge election shall be the same as the commencement date of the electing taxpayers.

(B) Subparagraph (A) may not apply if the value of total business assets of the electing taxpayers does not exceed the value of total business assets of the nonelecting
 taxpayers. In that event, the water’s-edge election of each electing taxpayer is terminated as of the date the nonelecting taxpayers are, pursuant to the audit determination described in subparagraph (A), properly included in the same combined reporting group as the electing taxpayers.

(C) For purposes of applying the business asset test of this paragraph, the term “business assets” shall have the same meaning as subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6), except that the business assets of other members of the unitary affiliate group that are not taxpayers shall not be taken into account.

(D) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), nonelecting taxpayers may not be deemed to have made a water’s-edge election if the Franchise Tax Board audit determination described in subparagraph (A) is
 withdrawn or otherwise overturned.

(6) For purposes of paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, the following shall apply:

(A) “Business assets” are assets, including intangible assets, other than stock of a member of the unitary affiliate group, which are used in the conduct of the business of the unitary affiliate group or would produce business income to the unitary affiliate group, if an election were not in place, if the assets were sold. Business assets shall be valued at net book value.

(B) The phrase “unitary affiliate group” refers to all of those
 corporations that would constitute a unitary group if a water’s-edge election were not made.

(C) The phrase “new unitary affiliate group” refers to a unitary affiliate group that is created by a new affiliation of two or more corporations, or by the addition of one or more new members to an existing unitary affiliate group.

(D) The phrase “component unitary group” means that portion of a group of corporations that have become members of a new unitary affiliate group that were members of their own respective unitary affiliate group prior to entering the new unitary affiliate group, disregarding any corporations that did not become part of the new unitary group.

(7) In the application of paragraphs (2) to
 (4), inclusive, a series of acquisitions as steps of a single transaction shall be aggregated as a single change of membership.

(8) In the event of a merger or consolidation, the water’s-edge status and election commencement date or termination date of the surviving corporation shall be consistent with the result that would have been obtained under paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, if the surviving corporation had acquired the stock of the transferor corporation.

(9) A water’s-edge election may be terminated without the consent of the Franchise Tax Board after it has been in effect for at least 84 months. The termination shall be made on an original, timely filed return for the first year in which the water’s-edge election is to be terminated. To be effective, the termination
 shall be made by every taxpayer that is a member of the water’s-edge group in the same manner as the election provided under subdivisions (a) and (b).

(10) A water’s-edge election may be terminated before the 84-month period described in paragraph (9) has elapsed, but only with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board. A request for termination shall be made at the time and in the manner specified by the Franchise Tax Board.

(A) The request may be granted for good cause. For purposes of this section, good cause shall have the same meaning as specified in Treasury Regulations Section 1.1502-75(c).

(B) The Franchise Tax Board shall consent to a termination requested by all members of a water’s-edge group, if the purpose of
 the request is to permit the state to contract with an expatriate corporation, or its subsidiary, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 10286 of the Public Contract Code. A water’s-edge election terminated pursuant to this subparagraph shall, however, be effective for the year in which the expatriate
 corporation, or its subsidiary, enters into the contract with the state.

(11) Except for deemed elections as provided in paragraphs (2), (4), and (5), if a water’s-edge election is terminated under paragraph (9) or (10), another election may not be made under this section for any taxable year that begins within the 84-month period following the last day of the election period that was terminated. The Franchise Tax Board may waive the application of this prohibition period for good cause.

(12) A water’s-edge election shall remain in effect until terminated.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following shall apply:

(1) A “combined reporting group”
 means those corporations whose income and apportionment factors are properly considered pursuant to this chapter in computing the income of the individual taxpayer that is derived from or attributable to sources within this state, taking into account a valid water’s-edge election.

(2) A “group return” refers to the single return which taxpayer members of a combined reporting group may elect by contract to file, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, in lieu of filing their own respective returns.

(3) A “self-assessed combined reporting group” means that group of corporations whose income and apportionment factors are reflected in a combined report prepared pursuant to this chapter in a timely filed return, taking into account the effects of a purported
 water’s-edge election, whether or not the membership of the corporations in that combined report was correctly determined.

(e) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

(f) To the extent that a taxpayer would have been required to file on a water’s-edge basis in its first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2003, pursuant to a water’s-edge election made in a prior year under Section 25111, the terms of Section 25111 may not apply and the election shall be deemed to have been made under the terms of this section. However, the commencement date of the election made in a prior year under Section 25111 shall continue to be treated as the commencement date of the water’s-edge
 election period for purposes of applying this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 297, Sec. 4.   (AB 3372)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

25114.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board, for purposes of administering the provisions of this article, shall examine all returns filed by taxpayers subject to these provisions.

(b) (1) In any case of two or more organizations, trades, or businesses, whether or not organized in the United States and whether or not affiliated, owned or controlled directly or indirectly by the same interests, the Franchise Tax Board may distribute, apportion, or allocate gross
 income, deductions, credits, or allowances between or among these organizations, trades, or businesses, if the board determines that the distribution, apportionment, or allocation is necessary in order to prevent evasion of taxes or clearly to reflect the income of any of these organizations, trades, or businesses. In the case of any transfer, or license, of intangible property, within the meaning of Section 936(h)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, the income with respect to that transfer or license shall be commensurate with the income attributable to the intangible property.

(2) In making distributions, apportionments, and allocations under this section, the Franchise Tax Board shall generally follow the rules, regulations, and procedures of the Internal Revenue Service in making audits under Section 482 of the Internal Revenue Code. Any of these rules, regulations, and procedures adopted by the Franchise Tax Board shall not be subject to
 review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(3) If the Internal Revenue Service has conducted a detailed audit pursuant to Section 482 of the Internal Revenue Code or Subchapter N of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code and has made adjustments pursuant to those provisions, it shall be presumed, to the extent that the provisions relate to the determination of the amount of income and factors required to be taken into account pursuant to Section 25110, that no further adjustments are necessary for this state’s purposes. If the Internal Revenue Service has conducted a detailed audit pursuant to Section 482 of the Internal Revenue Code or Subchapter N of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code and has made or proposed no adjustments to the transactions examined, it shall be presumed, to the extent that the provisions relate to the determination of the amount of income and factors required to be taken into account
 pursuant to Section 25110, that no adjustment is necessary for this state’s purposes. These presumptions apply to all Internal Revenue Service audit determinations, including determinations made by the Appeals and Competent Authority. These presumptions shall be overcome if the Franchise Tax Board or the taxpayer demonstrates that an adjustment or a failure to make an adjustment was erroneous, if it demonstrates that the results of such an adjustment would produce a minimal tax change for federal purposes because of correlative or offsetting adjustments or for other reasons, or if substantially the same federal tax result was obtained under other sections of the Internal Revenue Code. No inference shall be drawn from an Internal Revenue Service failure to audit international transactions pursuant to Section 482 of the Internal Revenue Code or Subchapter N of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code and it shall not be presumed that any of those transactions were correctly reported.

(c) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to examinations commenced by the Franchise Tax Board on or after the effective date of that act. An examination will be considered commenced when a taxpayer is first contacted by the Franchise Tax Board concerning any examination with respect to the taxpayer’s return.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 306, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

25116.

Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 23051.5, when provisions of this article refer to provisions of the Internal Revenue Code that do not otherwise apply for purposes of Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) or this part, the term “Internal Revenue Code” means Title 26 of the United States Code, including all amendments thereto, as in effect for federal purposes for the taxable period, except as otherwise specifically provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 633, Sec. 11.   Effective September 30, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Uniform Division of Income for Tax Purposes Act [25120. - 25141.]

25120.

As used in Sections 25120 to 25139, inclusive, which shall hereafter be referred to as “this act,” unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Business income” means income arising from transactions and activity in the regular course of the taxpayer’s trade or business and includes income from tangible and intangible property if the acquisition, management, and disposition of the property constitute integral parts of the taxpayer’s regular trade or business operations.

(b) “Commercial domicile” means the principal place from which the trade or business of the taxpayer is directed or managed.

(c) “Compensation” means wages, salaries, commissions and any other form of remuneration paid to employees for personal services.

(d) “Nonbusiness income” means all income other than business income.

(e) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2011, “sales” means all gross receipts of the taxpayer not allocated under Sections 25123 to 25127, inclusive.

(f) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011:

(1) “Sales” means all gross receipts of the taxpayer not allocated under Sections 25123
 to 25127, inclusive.

(2) “Gross receipts” means the gross amounts realized (the sum of money and the fair market value of other property or services received) on the sale or exchange of property, the performance of services, or the use of property or capital (including rents, royalties, interest, and dividends) in a transaction that produces business income, in which the income, gain, or loss is recognized (or would be recognized if the transaction were in the United States) under the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for purposes of this part. Amounts realized on the sale or exchange of property shall not be reduced by the cost of goods sold or the basis of property sold. Gross receipts, even if business income, shall not include the following items:

(A) Repayment, maturity, or redemption of the principal of a loan, bond, mutual fund, certificate of deposit, or similar
 marketable instrument.

(B) The principal amount received under a repurchase agreement or other transaction properly characterized as a loan.

(C) Proceeds from issuance of the taxpayer’s own stock or from sale of treasury stock.

(D) Damages and other amounts received as the result of litigation.

(E) Property acquired by an agent on behalf of another.

(F) Tax refunds and other tax benefit recoveries.

(G) Pension reversions.

(H) Contributions to capital (except for sales of securities by securities dealers).

(I) Income from discharge of indebtedness.

(J) Amounts realized from exchanges of inventory that are not recognized under the Internal Revenue Code.

(K) Amounts received from transactions in intangible assets held in connection with a treasury function of the taxpayer’s unitary business and the gross receipts and overall net gains from the maturity, redemption, sale, exchange, or other disposition of those intangible assets. For purposes of this subparagraph, “treasury function” means the pooling, management, and investment of intangible assets for the purpose of satisfying the cash flow needs of the taxpayer’s trade or business, such as providing liquidity for a taxpayer’s business cycle, providing a reserve for business contingencies, and business acquisitions, and also includes the use of futures contracts and options
 contracts to hedge foreign currency fluctuations. A taxpayer principally engaged in the trade or business of purchasing and selling intangible assets of the type typically held in a taxpayer’s treasury function, such as a registered broker-dealer, is not performing a treasury function, for purposes of this subparagraph, with respect to income so produced.

(L) Amounts received from hedging transactions involving intangible assets. A “hedging transaction” means a transaction related to the taxpayer’s trading function involving futures and options transactions for the purpose of hedging price risk of the products or commodities consumed, produced, or sold by the taxpayer.

(3) Exclusion of an item from the definition of “gross receipts” shall not be determinative of its character as business or nonbusiness income.

(4) The changes to this section by the act adding this sentence pertaining to taxable years beginning before January 1, 2011, constitute clarifying, nonsubstantive changes.

(g) “State” means any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any territory or possession of the United States, and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 17, Sec. 10.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25121.

Any taxpayer having income from business activity which is taxable both within and without this state shall allocate and apportion its net income as provided in this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25122.

For purposes of allocation and apportionment of income under this act, a taxpayer is taxable in another state if (a) in that state it is subject to a net income tax, a franchise tax measured by net income, a franchise tax for the privilege of doing business, or a corporate stock tax, or (b) that state has jurisdiction to subject the taxpayer to a net income tax regardless of whether, in fact, the state does or does not.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25123.

Rents and royalties from real or tangible personal property, capital gains, interest, dividends, or patent or copyright royalties, to the extent that they constitute nonbusiness income, shall be allocated as provided in Sections 25124 through 25127 of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25124.

(a) Net rents and royalties from real property located in this state are allocable to this state.

(b) Net rent and royalties from tangible personal property are allocable to this state:

(1) If and to the extent that the property is utilized in this state, or

(2) In their entirety if the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this state and the
 taxpayer is not organized under the laws of or taxable in the state in which the property is utilized.

(c) The extent of utilization of tangible personal property in a state is determined by multiplying the rents and royalties by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days of physical location of the property in the state during the rental or royalty period in the taxable year and the denominator of which is the number of days of physical location of the property everywhere during all rental or royalty periods in the taxable year. If the physical location of the property during the rental or royalty period is unknown or unascertainable by the taxpayer, tangible personal property is utilized in the state in which the property was located at the time the rental or royalty payer obtained possession.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 221.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25125.

(a) Capital gains and losses from sales of real property located in this state are allocable to this state.

(b) Capital gains and losses from sales of tangible personal property are allocable to this state if:

(1) The property had a situs in this state at the time of the sale, or

(2) The taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this state and the taxpayer is not taxable in the state in which the property had a
 situs.

(c) Except in the case of the sale of a partnership interest, capital gains and losses from sales of intangible personal property are allocable to this state if the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this state.

(d) Gain or loss on the sale of a partnership interest is allocable to this state in the ratio of the original cost of partnership tangible property in the state to the original cost of partnership tangible property everywhere, determined at the time of the sale. In the event that more than 50 percent of the value of partnership’s assets consist of intangibles, gain or loss from the sale of the partnership interest is allocated to this state in accordance with the sales factor of the partnership for its first full tax period immediately preceding the tax period of the partnership during which the partnership interest was sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1170, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1988.   Operative January 1, 1989, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1170.)
-------------------------------------------

25126.

Interest and dividends are allocable to this state if the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25127.

(a) Patent and copyright royalties are allocable to this state:

(1) If and to the extent that the patent or copyright is utilized by the payor in this state, or

(2) If and to the extent that the patent or copyright is utilized by the payor in a state in which the taxpayer is not taxable and the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is in this state.

(b) A patent is utilized in a state to the extent that it is employed in production, fabrication, manufacturing, or
 other processing in the state or to the extent that a patented product is produced in the state. If the basis of receipts from patent royalties does not permit allocation to states or if the accounting procedures do not reflect states of utilization, the patent is utilized in the state in which the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is located.

(c) A copyright is utilized in a state to the extent that printing or other publication originates in the state. If the basis of receipts from copyright royalties does not permit allocation to states or if the accounting procedures do not reflect states of utilization, the copyright is utilized in the state in which the taxpayer’s commercial domicile is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25128.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 38006, for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2013, all business income shall be apportioned to this state by multiplying the business income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor plus twice the sales factor, and the denominator of which is four, except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c).

(b) If an apportioning trade or business derives more than 50 percent of its “gross business receipts” from conducting one or more qualified business activities, all business income of the apportioning trade or business shall be apportioned to this state by multiplying business income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor plus the sales factor, and
 the denominator of which is three.

(c) For purposes of this section, a “qualified business activity” means the following:

(1) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2025: 

(A) An agricultural business activity.

(B) An extractive business activity.

(C) A savings and loan activity.

(D) A banking or financial business activity.

(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025:

(A) An agricultural business activity.

(B) An extractive business activity.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Gross business receipts” means gross receipts described in subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 25120, other than gross receipts from sales or other transactions within an apportioning trade or business between members of a group of corporations whose income and apportionment factors are required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101, limited, if applicable, by Section 25110, whether or not the receipts are excluded from the sales factor by operation of Section 25137.

(2) “Agricultural business activity” means activities relating to any stock, dairy, poultry, fruit, furbearing animal, or truck farm, plantation, ranch, nursery, or range. “Agricultural business activity” also includes activities relating to cultivating the soil or raising or harvesting any agricultural or horticultural commodity, including, but not limited to, the raising, shearing, feeding, caring for, training, or management of animals on a farm as well as the handling, drying, packing, grading, or storing on a farm any agricultural or horticultural commodity in its unmanufactured state, but only if the owner, tenant, or operator of the farm regularly produces more than
 one-half of the commodity so treated.

(3) “Extractive business activity” means activities relating to the production, refining, or processing of oil, natural gas, or mineral ore.

(4) “Savings and loan activity” means any activities performed by savings and loan associations or savings banks that have been chartered by federal or state law.

(5) “Banking or financial business activity” means activities attributable to dealings in money or moneyed capital in substantial competition with the business of national banks.

(6) “Apportioning trade or business” means a distinct trade or business whose business income is required to be apportioned under Sections 25101 and 25120, limited, if applicable, by Section 25110, using the same denominator for each of the applicable payroll, property, and sales factors.

(7) Paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) shall apply only if the Franchise Tax Board adopts the Proposed Multistate Tax Commission Formula for
 the Uniform Apportionment of Net Income from Financial Institutions, or its substantial equivalent, and shall become operative upon the same operative date as the adopted formula.

(8) In any case where the income and apportionment factors of two or more savings associations or corporations are required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101, limited, if applicable, by Section 25110, both of the following shall apply:

(A) The application of the more than 50 percent test of subdivision (b) shall be made with respect to the “gross business receipts” of the entire apportioning trade or business of the group.

(B) The entire business income of the group shall be apportioned in accordance with either subdivision (a) or (b), or Section 25128.7, as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 22.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 6, 2012, by initiative Prop. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

25128.7.

Notwithstanding Section 38006, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2013, all business income of an apportioning trade or business, other than an apportioning trade or business described in subdivision (b) of Section 25128, shall be apportioned to this state by multiplying the business income by the sales factor.

(History: Added November 6, 2012, by initiative Proposition 39, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

25128.9.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) In 1966, the California Legislature enacted the Uniform Division of Income for Tax Purposes Act under Sections 25120 through 25139, inclusive, of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) That act provides for the allocation and apportionment of income of taxpayer having income from business activities which is taxable both within and without the state.

(3) On April 28, 2006, the Franchise Tax Board issued Franchise Tax Board Legal Ruling 2006-1 (the Legal Ruling), regarding the treatment of apportionment factors attributable to income exempt from income tax
 under the Corporation Tax Law.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Legal Ruling shall apply with respect to apportionment factors attributable to the income of taxpayers subject to tax under the Corporation Tax Law.

(5) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(6) It is the intent of the Legislature that the clarification in this section apply to any apportionment formula currently and formerly allowed under this article.

(b) (1) A transaction or activity, to the extent that it generates income or loss not included in “net income,” as defined in Section 24341, subject to apportionment, shall be excluded from the apportionment formulas
 under this part, including Sections 25128, 25128.7, and 25141, and former Section 25128.5.

(2) For the purposes of this section, “not included in ‘net income,’” means income from transactions and activities that is not included in net income subject to apportionment for any reason, including, but not limited to, exclusion, deduction, exemption, elimination, or nonrecognition.

(c) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may adopt regulations that are necessary or appropriate to carry out the purpose of this section, which is to prevent inclusion within the apportionment formula of transactions and activities that give rise to income that is not subject to apportionment.

(2) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code)
 shall not apply to any regulation, standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, guideline, or any other guidance established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(d) This section shall apply to taxable years beginning before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 41.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

25129.

The property factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the average value of the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in this state during the taxable year and the denominator of which is the average value of all the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used during the taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 222.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25130.

Property owned by the taxpayer is valued at its original cost. Property rented by the taxpayer is valued at eight times the net annual rental rate. Net annual rental rate is the annual rental rate paid by the taxpayer less any annual rental rate received by the taxpayer from subrentals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25131.

The average value of property shall be determined by averaging the values at the beginning and ending of the taxable year but the Franchise Tax Board may require the averaging of monthly values during the taxable year if reasonably required to reflect properly the average value of the taxpayer’s property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 223.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25132.

The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total amount paid in this state during the taxable year by the taxpayer for compensation, and the denominator of which is the total compensation paid everywhere during the taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 224.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25133.

Compensation is paid in this state if:

(a) The individual’s service is performed entirely within the state; or

(b) The individual’s service is performed both within and without the state, but the service performed without the state is incidental to the individual’s service within the state; or

(c) Some of the service is performed in the state and (1) the base of operations or, if there is no base of operations, the place from which the service is directed or
 controlled is in the state, or (2) the base of operations or the place from which the service is directed or controlled is not in any state in which some part of the service is performed, but the individual’s residence is in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25134.

The sales factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total sales of the taxpayer in this state during the taxable year, and the denominator of which is the total sales of the taxpayer everywhere during the taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 225.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25135.

(a) Sales of tangible personal property are in this state if:

(1) The property is delivered or shipped to a purchaser, other than the United States government, within this state regardless of the f.o.b. point or other conditions of the sale.

(2) The property is shipped from an office, store, warehouse, factory, or other place of storage in this state and (A) the purchaser is the United States government or
 (B) the taxpayer is not taxable in the state of the purchaser.

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, for purposes of determining whether sales are in this state and included in the numerator of the sales factor, all sales of the combined reporting group properly assigned to this state under this section shall be included in the sales factor numerator for this state regardless of whether the member of the combined reporting group making the sale is subject to the taxes imposed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501) of this part. All sales not assigned to this state pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be included in the sales factor numerator for this state if a member of the combined reporting group of the taxpayer is taxable in the state of the purchaser.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe
 regulations as necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 17, Sec. 12.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25136.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 38006, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2013, sales, other than sales of tangible personal property, are in this state if:

(1) Sales from services are in this state to the extent the purchaser of the service received the benefit of the services in this state.

(2) Sales from intangible property are in this state to the extent the property is used in this state. In the case of marketable securities, sales are in this state if the customer is in this state.

(3) Sales from the sale, lease, rental, or licensing of real property are in this state if the real property is located in this state.

(4) Sales from the rental, lease, or licensing of tangible personal property are in this state if the property is located in this state.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe regulations as necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.
